Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2633.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 511.41 Living organ donors. 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires: a. âCovered personâ means a policyholder, subscriber, enrollee, or other individual participating in a policy. b. âInsurerâ means a company qualified and licensed by the insurance division to transact the business of insurance in this state by certificate issued pursuant to chapter 508, 514, 514A, 514B, or 514E. c. âLiving organ donorâ means an individual who is not deceased and who has donated all or part of an organ. d. âPolicyâ means a life insurance policy, disability insurance policy, or long-term care insurance policy. 2. An insurer shall not, based solely on an individualâs status as a living organ donor, do any of the following: a. Decline or limit coverage under a policy for a covered person that is a living organ donor. b. As a condition of continued coverage under a policy, preclude a covered person from becoming a living organ donor. c. Discriminate against a covered person or individual in the offering, issuance, cancellation, coverage amount, price, House File 2633, p. 2 or any other condition of a policy on the sole basis that the covered person or individual is a living organ donor. 3. The commissioner of insurance may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this section. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2633, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor